Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 18

Contested Election of Governor

2-18-101. Determination by general assembly.

The procedure for deciding the election of governor in case of contest shall be: The two (2) houses of the general assembly shall, on a day of its organizational session designated by joint resolution, meet in joint convention in the hall of the house of representatives to open the returns of the election for governor, to determine the election, and to declare the result.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1801.

Cross-References. Contested elections, title 2, ch. 17.

Governor chosen by electors of members of general assembly, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 2.

Tie vote for governor, general assembly casting, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 2.

2-18-102. Quorum — Vote — Adoption of rules of order — Power to compel attendance.

A majority of the members of each house shall constitute a quorum. The speaker of the senate shall preside.

Every member shall have one (1) vote, and the majority of the votes shall prevail on all questions to be determined by the joint convention.

The joint session may be adjourned from time to time and rules of order made by it may be adopted and altered.

A minority of the members of the joint convention shall have the power to compel the attendance of absentees by arrest on warrant issued and signed by the speaker of the senate, executed by the sergeant-at-arms of the senate or by any person authorized by the joint convention.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1802.

Cross-References. Organization of senate and house of representatives, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 11.

2-18-103. Tellers.

Before the joint session, each house shall appoint two (2) tellers from different political parties. The tellers shall keep, certify, and deliver to the speaker of the senate a list of the votes in the joint convention.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1803.

2-18-104. Examination of election returns.

When the joint assembly has convened, the speaker of the senate shall, in the presence of the assembled members, open the returns of the election for governor. They shall be opened by counties in alphabetical order. As the returns of a county are opened, they shall be handed to the tellers who shall make a list of the votes. Any member may inspect the returns while they are in the tellers' hands. The returns shall then be handed back to the speaker of the senate, who shall read them to the assembled members.

As the returns from each county are read, the speaker shall call for objections by claimants of the office of governor other than the candidate who prevails on the face of the returns. Upon objection to any county's returns, the vote of that county shall not then be counted, but the returns shall, with the objections, be delivered to the speaker for safekeeping, and they shall not be further considered until all the counties have been disposed of in like manner.

If no objections are made, the vote of the county under consideration shall be counted and shall be final except for objections permitted under § 2-18-106.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1804.

2-18-105. Aggregate vote when no objection — Resolution of election.

After the returns of all the counties have been considered, if there is no objection by any claimant, the aggregate vote shall be announced by the speaker of the senate, and the person having the highest number of votes shall then be declared to be elected by resolution, which shall be in order and passed in substantially this form: “Resolved, That , having the highest number of votes at the election in November last, has been elected and shall be Governor of Tennessee.”

If it appears to the convention that the result would not be changed if all objections were sustained, the person having the highest number of votes shall be declared elected as in subsection (a).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1805.

2-18-106. Committee on the governor's election.

If it appears to the convention that to sustain any of the objections would change the result, a committee shall be appointed as the “Committee on the Governor's Election” and the candidate who prevails on the face of the returns shall then be permitted to file objections as were the other claimants.

The committee shall be composed of seven (7) members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, not more than four (4) of whom may belong to the same political party, and five (5) members of the senate, appointed by the speaker of the senate, not more than three (3) of whom may belong to the same political party.

Vacancies in the committee from death or other causes shall be filled by appointment by the speaker of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives who appointed the original member.

They shall elect one (1) of their number chair.

Any seven (7) shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of a subcommittee shall constitute a quorum thereof.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 16; T.C.A., § 2-1806.

2-18-107. Presence of candidates — Objections and petitions — Answer.

All persons receiving votes for governor and their attorneys may be present on the floor during the call of counties but only for the purpose of filing objections.

When an objection is made, it shall be followed by a petition stating the grounds of objection clearly and concisely, making specific assignment of the grounds relied on other than the face of the returns, designating the counties, civil districts, wards, and precincts, with specifications as to the irregularities, fraud, error, mistake or illegalities relied upon. The petition shall be filed with the speaker or tellers, not later than the day following the day on which the call of the counties has been concluded.

A copy of the petition of objection shall be served upon each claimant or left at the claimant's usual place of residence, within five (5) days after the filing of the petition, which service shall be sufficient. The copy may be served by the sergeant-at-arms of the senate or house of representatives or one (1) of the assistants of either, by any sheriff or the sheriff's deputy, or by any private person, but if served by a private person, the return showing service shall be on oath in writing.

Within five (5) days after the service of the copy, each person, other than the petitioner, claiming the office of governor by virtue of the election may file with the speaker or tellers an answer making specific assignments of the grounds relied upon and making counter-objections other than to the face of the returns, designating the counties, civil districts, wards, and precincts, with specifications as to the irregularities, fraud, error, mistake, or illegalities relied upon.

The answer shall include specific denials of such assignments of charges by the petitioner as they may see proper.

All charges not denied shall be taken as true.

A copy of each answer shall be served on each claimant as in the case of the petition.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1807.

2-18-108. Specific denials to answer.

The petitioner shall, within two (2) days from the filing of an answer containing counter-objections, file such specific denials thereto as the petitioner may see proper. All charges not denied shall be taken as true.

A copy of the petitioner's answer shall be served on each claimant as in the case of the petition.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1808.

2-18-109. Powers and duties of committee.

The objections, petitions and answers shall be referred to the committee.

The committee shall take evidence and consider the objections.

The committee and any subcommittee of it may:

Send for and examine persons and papers;

Issue compulsory process for them running to every county in the state, which may be executed by the sergeant-at-arms of either house or any assistant sergeant-at-arms, or by any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or constable, or by any special agent appointed by the chair of the committee or by the chair of any subcommittee;

Punish for contempt by fine and imprisonment;

Employ stenographers;

Sit for the taking of evidence at any place in Tennessee and, when in their judgment necessary, in four (4) subcommittees;

Take depositions upon such notice and under such rules and regulations as they may prescribe in the absence of rules prescribed by the general assembly;

Fix the time in which the evidence in chief and rebuttal shall be produced or taken and the time for argument; and

Do all things proper and necessary to ascertain the facts and report on them.

The evidence shall be taken within the forty (40) days next after the issues are made except that, if within forty (40) days the committee on the governor's election asks for further time, the general assembly may grant it.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 17; T.C.A., § 2-1809.

2-18-110. Petition and answer to be verified — Oaths.

The petition and answer shall be sworn to and stated to be true to the best of the person's knowledge, information and belief. The pleading shall make the issues but shall have no weight as evidence.

The chair of the committee and the chairs of subcommittees may administer oaths to witnesses.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 18; T.C.A., § 2-1810.

2-18-111. Adjournment pending determination of objections.

Pending the determination of objections, the two (2) houses may, from time to time, adjourn the joint convention, and resolve themselves into their respective houses, and they may proceed as if no such proceedings were pending. The adjournment may be to a day certain or subject to the call of the speaker of the senate.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1811.

2-18-112. Report of committee.

The committee shall proceed with all convenient speed to file its report with the speaker of the senate. The evidence shall accompany the report.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1812.

2-18-113. Consideration of report.

When the report has been made, the speaker of the senate shall cause the members of both houses to be notified, in open session of each house, that the report has been made. The speaker of the senate shall fix the day for the consideration of the report.

The members of both houses shall then assemble and consider the report and determine the election. They shall decide the questions involved and determine which person received the highest number of legal votes. A faithful and correct record of all the proceedings of the joint assembly shall be kept by the clerk of the senate, which, together with the reports of the committee, shall be entered upon the journal of the senate.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1813.

2-18-114. Announcement of aggregate vote — Declaration of election by resolution.

Upon the decision, the speaker of the senate shall announce the aggregate vote of the persons voted for as corrected and determined by the joint assembly. The person having the highest number shall be declared to be elected by resolution as under §2-18-105.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1814.

2-18-115. Resolution evidence of election — Inauguration.

The resolution shall be the evidence that the person named in the resolution has been elected governor and is entitled to be inaugurated. A copy of the resolution certified by the speaker of the senate and the tellers shall be issued to such person.

The governor-elect shall thereafter be inaugurated as soon as practicable, on a day to be designated by resolution of the general assembly. The oath of office shall be administered by the chief justice or an associate judge of the supreme court in the presence of the general assembly or a committee appointed by them.

The governor's term of office shall date from January 15 next following the November in which the election was held.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1815.

2-18-116. Finality of determination.

When the general assembly has determined the contest for governor under this chapter, the determination is final and conclusive.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1816.

2-18-117. Bond — Enforcement of penalty.

A claimant, before making objection under § 2-18-104, shall enter into bond and good security to be approved by the speakers of the senate and house of representatives, in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), payable to the state of Tennessee, conditioned upon the faithful and bona fide prosecution of the contest.

If no bond is filed for approval with the speaker of the senate by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on December 15 after the election, there may be no contest of the election.

If a bond is filed by that time, other claimants may file their bonds until twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the seventh day after the first bond is filed.

The penalty of the bond shall not be enforced against a contestant and the contestant's securities unless the joint assembly concludes that the contest was not in good faith, was malicious, was made for political effect or was without reasonable cause, in which case the joint assembly shall so declare and order the enforcement of the penalty of the bond.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1817.